nb: Breddejustering: Justerbar bredde; Fast bredde; Annet
pt-BR: Ajuste de largura: Largura ajustável; Largura fixa; Outro
es: Ajuste de anchura: Ancho ajustable; Ancho fijo; Otros
hr-HR: Prilagođavanje širine: Podesiva širina; Fiksna širina; Ostalo
vi: Điều chỉnh chiều rộng: Chiều rộng có thể điều chỉnh; Chiều rộng cố định; Khác
ru: Регулировка ширины: Регулируемая ширина; Фиксированная ширина; Другой
lt-LT: Pločio reguliavimas: Reguliuojamas plotis; Fiksuotas plotis; Kita
pl: Regulacja szerokości: Regulowana szerokość; Stała szerokość; Inne
ko: 너비 조정: 조절 가능한 너비; 고정 너비; 기타
ro-RO: Ajustare lățime: Lățime ajustabilă; Lățime fixă; Altele
nl: Breedteaanpassing: Verstelbare breedte; Vaste breedte; Andere
en: Width adjustment: Adjustable width; Fixed width; Other
sl-SI: Prilagoditev širine: Nastavljiva širina; Fiksna širina; Drugo
zh-CN: 宽度调节: 可调节宽度; 固定宽度; 其他
el: Ρύθμιση πλάτους: Ρυθμιζόμενο πλάτος; Σταθερό πλάτος; Άλλο
de: Breitenverstellung: Verstellbare Breite; Feste Breite; Sonstiges
cs: Nastavení šířky: Nastavitelná šířka; Pevná šířka; Jiné
bg-BG: Регулиране на ширината: Регулируема ширина; Фиксирана ширина; Други
sk-SK: Nastavenie šírky: Nastaviteľná šírka; Pevná šírka; Iné
pt-PT: Ajuste de largura: Largura ajustável; Largura fixa; Outro
fi: Leveyden säätö: Säädettävä leveys; Kiinteä leveys; Muu
tr: Genişlik ayarı: Ayarlanabilir genişlik; Sabit genişlik; Diğer
ja: 幅調整: 調整可能幅; 固定幅; その他
sv: Breddjustering: Justerbar bredd; Fast bredd; Övrigt
fr: Ajustement de la largeur: Largeur ajustable; Largeur fixe; Autre
hu: Szélességállítás: Állítható szélesség; Rögzített szélesség; Egyéb
th: การปรับความกว้าง: ปรับความกว้างได้; ความกว้างคงที่; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 寬度調節: 可調節寬度; 固定寬度; 其他
it: Regolazione della larghezza: Larghezza regolabile; Larghezza fissa; Altro
da: Breddejustering: Justerbar bredde; Fast bredde; Andet